Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB23.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(d), (f), (h) and (i) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(d) "Wages" mean compensation due to any employe by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 full face value, subject to such deductions, charges or allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under section 9."Wage" paid to any employe includes the reasonable cost, as determined by the secretary, to the employer for furnishing such employe with board, lodging, or other facilities, if such board, lodging, or other facilities are customarily furnished by such employer to his or her employes: Provided, That the cost of board, lodging, or other facilities shall not be included as a part of the wage paid to any employe to the extent it is excluded therefrom under the terms of a bona fide collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular employe: Provided, further, That the secretary is authorized to determine the fair value of such board, lodging, or other facilities for defined classes of employes and in defined areas, based on average cost to the employer or to groups of employers similarly situated, or average value to groups of employes, or other appropriate measures of fair value. Such evaluations, where applicable and pertinent, shall be used in lieu of actual measure of cost in determining the wage paid to any employe.[In determining the hourly wage an employer is required to pay a tipped employe, the amount paid such employe by his or her employer shall be an amount equal to: (i) the cash wage paid the employe which for the purposes of the determination shall be not less than the cash wage required to be paid the employe on the date immediately prior to the effective date of this subparagraph; and (ii) an additional amount on account of the tips received by the employe which is equal to the difference between the wage specified in subparagraph (i) and the wage in effect under section 4 of this act. The additional amount on 20250HB0023PN2444 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 account of tips may not exceed the value of tips actually received by the employe. The previous sentence shall not apply with respect to any tipped employe unless:(1) Such employe has been informed by the employer of the provisions of this subsection;(2) All tips received by such employe have been retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered to the employer to be used as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the current hourly minimum rate in effect; where the gratuity is added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management, or by the customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the employe; except that this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips.] In determining compliance with section 4, gratuities shall be in addition to wages and may not be credited against the wage required under section 4. An employer may not, directly or indirectly, take, keep or divert any part of an employe's gratuities. Where a gratuity is added to a charge by the establishment or the customer, the gratuity shall be the sole property of the employe who performed the service. A tip pool may be permitted only among employes who customarily receive gratuities and may not include an employer, manager or supervisor. Any gratuities paid by credit card shall be remitted in full to the employe, without deduction for processing or other fees, no later than the next regular payday.* * *[(f) "Employe" includes to suffer or to permit to work.]* * *(h) "Employe" includes any individual [employed by an employer.] who is suffered or permitted to work for 20250HB0023PN2444 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remuneration. The term includes, without limitation, a domestic worker, agricultural worker, incarcerated worker participating in a work program, worker with a disability, minor or individual who performs labor or services through a marketplace platform or similar arrangement, regardless of job title or contractual designation.(i) "Gratuities" means [voluntary, monetary contributions received by an employe from a guest, patron or customer for services rendered.] a voluntary monetary amount paid by a guest, patron or customer to an employe for services rendered.(j) "Domestic worker" means an individual who performs services of a household nature in or for a private dwelling, including housekeeping, cleaning, cooking, home care or child care.(k) "Agricultural worker" means an individual engaged in agricultural production, including planting, cultivating, harvesting or caring for livestock.(l) "Marketplace platform" means a person or entity operating a digital platform or application that facilitates the provision of services to end users by individuals who receive remuneration for the services.(m) "Marketplace contractor" means an individual who provides services to end users through a marketplace platform for remuneration.(n) "Worker with a disability" means an individual whose earning or productive capacity is impaired by a physical or mental condition.Section 2. Section 4(e) of the act is amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be 20250HB0023PN2444 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:* * *(9) Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning July 1, 2026. (10) Beginning July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, the minimum wage shall increase by one dollar ($1) an hour from the previous year until the hourly rate for each employe reaches a living wage for a household of two adults and two children based on the average cost of living, by county, as determined by the department. The minimum wage shall be automatically indexed to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area upon meeting or exceeding the living wage threshold in the prior fiscal year.* * *(e) In lieu of the minimum wage prescribed in subsection (a) [and section 5(c)] and notwithstanding subsections (b) and (d), an employer may, during the first sixty calendar days when an employe under the age of twenty years is initially employed, pay the employe training wages at a rate of not less than the minimum wage set forth in section 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 206(a)). A person employed at the training wage under this subsection shall be informed of the amount of the training wage and the right to receive the full minimum wage, or a higher wage, upon completion of the training period. No employer may take any action to displace existing employes, including partial displacements such as reduction in the hours, wages or employment benefits of existing employes, for purposes of hiring individuals at the training wage 20250HB0023PN2444 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized by this subsection.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Eligibility and Coverage.--(a) Notwithstanding the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (52 Stat. 1060, 29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.), the minimum wage under this act shall apply to all classes of workers, including domestic workers, agricultural workers, incarcerated workers participating in work programs, workers with a disability, minors and marketplace contractors.(b) The sub-minimum cash wage of two dollars eighty-three cents ($2.83) for tipped employes is abolished.Section 4. Sections 5(a)(1) and (2) and (c), 8, 9 and 13 of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Exemptions.--(a) Employment in the following classifications shall be exempt from both the minimum wage and overtime provisions of this act:[(1) Labor on a farm;(2) Domestic services in or about the private home of the employer;]* * * [(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 4(a)(7) and (8), an employer unless otherwise exempt from the minimum wage provisions of section 4(a)(6) whose employe complement is composed of the equivalent of ten or less full-time employes to be calculated on a forty-hour workweek shall pay:(i) Five dollars sixty-five cents ($5.65) an hour beginning January 1, 2007.(ii) Six dollars sixty-five cents ($6.65) an hour beginning July 1, 2007.(2) Such employer shall pay the full amount of the minimum wage under section 4(a)(8) beginning July 1, 2008.]20250HB0023PN2444 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8. Duty of Employer.--Every employer of employes shall keep a true and accurate record of the hours worked by each employe and the wages paid to each, and shall furnish to the secretary or his or her duly authorized representative, upon demand, a sworn statement of the same. Such records shall be open to inspection by any duly authorized representative of the secretary at any reasonable time and shall be preserved for a period of three years. Every employer subject to this act shall keep a summary of this act and any regulations issued thereunder applicable to him or her, posted in a conspicuous place where employes normally pass and can read it. Employers shall, upon request, be furnished copies of such summaries without charge. Employers shall permit any duly authorized representative of the secretary to interrogate any employe in the place of employment and during work hours with respect to the wages paid to and the hours worked by such employe or other employes. In addition, an employer shall provide each employe, on each regular payday, an itemized statement of hours worked, rates of pay, gross wages, the amount and nature of each deduction and the amount of any gratuities paid, including gratuities paid by credit card. Gratuities paid by credit card shall be paid in full to the employe without deduction for processing or other fees no later than the next regular payday. An employer may not require an employe to surrender or credit any gratuities toward the wage required under section 4.Section 9. Enforcement; Rules and Regulations.--The secretary shall enforce this act. The secretary shall make and, from time to time, revise regulations, with the assistance of the board, when requested by the secretary, which shall be deemed appropriate to carry out the purposes of this act and to 20250HB0023PN2444 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 safeguard the minimum wage rates thereby established. Such regulations may include, but are not limited to, regulations defining and governing bona fide executive, administrative, or professional employes and outside salespersons, learners and apprentices, their number, proportion, length of learning period, and other working conditions; handicapped workers; part-time pay; overtime standards; bonuses; allowances for board, lodging, apparel, or other facilities or services customarily furnished by employers to employes; [allowances for gratuities] regulation of gratuities, including tip pooling and payment practices consistent with section 3; or allowances for such other special conditions or circumstances which may be incidental to a particular employer-employe relationship. Regulations may not authorize crediting gratuities against the wage required under section 4.Section 13. Civil Actions.--If any employe is paid by his or her employer less than the minimum wages provided by section 4 of this act or by any regulation issued thereunder, such worker may recover in a civil action the full amount of such minimum wage less any amount actually paid to the worker by the employer, together with costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court, and any agreement between the employer and the worker to work for less than such minimum wage shall be no defense to such action. At the request of any employe paid less than the minimum wage to which such employe was entitled under this act and regulations issued thereunder, the secretary may take an assignment of such wage claim, in trust for the assigning worker and may bring any legal action necessary to collect such claim, and the employer shall be required to pay the cost and such reasonable attorney's fees as 20250HB0023PN2444 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be allowed by the court. An employe may also recover, in a civil action, any gratuities the employer unlawfully kept, diverted or failed to remit under section 3, together with costs and such reasonable attorney fees as may be allowed by the court.Section 5. Section 14.1 of the act is repealed:[Section 14.1. Preemption.--(a) Except as set forth in subsection (b), this act shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule concerning the subject matter of this act.(b) This section does not prohibit local regulation pursuant to an ordinance which was adopted by a municipality prior to January 1, 2006, and which remained in effect on January 1, 2006.]Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0023PN2444 - 9 - 1234567891011121314